Utah statutes.
40-8-16.   Approved notice of intention valid for life of operation --
Withdrawal, withholding, or refusal of approval -- Procedure and basis.
(1)  An approved notice of intention or approved revision of it remains valid
for the life of the mining operation, as stated in it, unless the board
withdraws the approval as provided in Subsection (2).
(2)  The board or the division shall not withdraw approval of a notice of
intention or revision of it, except as follows:
(a)  Approval may be withdrawn in the event that the operator substantially
fails to perform reclamation or conduct mining operations so that the approved
reclamation plan can be accomplished.
(b)  Approval may be withdrawn in the event that the operator fails to provide
and maintain surety as may be required under this chapter.
(c)  Approval may be withdrawn in the event that mining operations are
continuously shut down for a period in excess of five years, unless the
extended period is accepted upon application of the operator.
(3)  Approval of a notice of intention may not be refused, withheld, nor
withdrawn by the division until the operator, who holds or has applied for
such approval, has had an opportunity to request a hearing before the board,
present evidence, cross-examine, and participate fully in the proceedings.
Based on the record of the hearing, the board will issue an order concerning
the refusal, withholding, or withdrawal of the notice of intention.  If no
hearing is requested, the division may refuse, withhold, or withdraw approval
of a notice of intention.
(4)  In the event that the division or the board withdraws approval of a
notice of intention or its revision, all mining operations included under the
notice shall be suspended in accordance with procedures and schedule approved
by the division.
